Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Unlawful Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 36, art. 3.

Sec. 08.48.281.
Prohibited practice.

A person may not practice or offer to practice the profession of architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture in the state, or use in connection with the person’s name or otherwise assume or advertise a title or description tending to convey the impression that the person is an architect, an engineer, a land surveyor, or a landscape architect, unless the person has been registered under the provisions of this chapter or is a person to whom these provisions do not apply, or, in the case of a corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership, unless it has been authorized under this chapter.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, this chapter does not prohibit the practice of landscape architecture by a person who is not registered to practice landscape architecture if the services being performed by the person are within the scope of practice authorized by another license that is held by the person.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 89 SLA 1995; am §§ 20, 21 ch 47 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 38 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For code of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 36, art. 2.

Sec. 08.48.290.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.291.
Violations and penalties.

A person who practices or offers to practice architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture in the state without being registered or authorized to practice in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or a person presenting or attempting to use the certificate or the seal of another, or a person who gives false or forged evidence of any kind to the board or to a member of the board in obtaining or attempting to obtain a certificate, or a person who impersonates a registrant, or a person who uses or attempts to use an expired or revoked or nonexistent certificate, knowing of the certificate’s status, or a person who falsely claims to be registered and authorized to practice under this chapter, or a person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 22 ch 47 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For code of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 36, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

Failure to procure license as affecting enforceability of contract or right of recovery for work done, 44 ALR4th 271.

Sec. 08.48.295.
Civil penalty for unregistered or unauthorized practice.

In addition to any other provision of law, if a person practices or offers to practice architecture, engineering, or land surveying in the state without being registered or authorized to practice in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the board may enter an order levying a civil penalty.

A civil penalty levied under this section may not exceed $5,000 for each offense. In levying a civil penalty, the board shall set the amount of the penalty imposed under this section after taking into account appropriate factors, including the seriousness of the violation, the economic benefit resulting from the violation, the history of violations, and other matters the board considers appropriate.

Before issuing an order under this section, the board shall provide the person written notice and the opportunity to request, within 30 days of issuance of notice by the board, a hearing on the record.

In connection with proceedings under (a) and (b) of this section, the board may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the disclosure of evidence, and may request the attorney general to bring an action to enforce a subpoena.

A person aggrieved by the levy of a civil penalty under this section may file an appeal with the superior court for judicial review of the penalty under AS

44.62.560

.

If a person fails to pay a civil penalty within 30 days after entry of an order under (a) of this section, or if the order is stayed pending an appeal, within 10 days after the court enters a final judgment in favor of the board of an order appealed under (e) of this section, the board shall notify the attorney general. The attorney general may commence a civil action to recover the amount of the penalty.

An action to enforce an order under this section may be combined with an action for an injunction under AS

08.48.131

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 129 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For code of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 36, art. 2.

Secs. 08.48.300 — 08.48.310.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]